Maryland, session 2026, SB0088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
2–4A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board certified music therapist” means an individual who:
(1) Has completed the education and clinical training requirements
established by the American Music Therapy Association; and
(2) Holds current board certification from the Certification Board for Music
Therapists.
(c) “Individualized music therapy treatment plan” means a music therapy
treatment plan for a client that identifies the goals, objectives, and potential strategies for
– 1 –

Ch. 31 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the music therapy services appropriate for the client using music therapy interventions,
including:
(1) Music improvisation;
(2) Receptive music listening;
(3) Songwriting;
(4) Lyric discussion;
(5) Music and imagery;
(6) Music performance;
(7) Learning through music; and
(8) Movement to music.
(d) (1) “License” means a license issued by the Board to engage in the practice
of music therapy.
(2) “LICENSE” INCLUDES, UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES
OTHERWISE, A LIMITED LICENSE.
(e) “Licensed professional music therapist” or “licensee” means an individual who
is licensed by the Board to engage in the practice of music therapy.
(f) “LIMITED LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD TO
PRACTICE MUSIC THERAPY AS LIMITED BY § 2–4A–11.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) “Practice of music therapy” means the clinical and evidence–based use
of music therapy interventions to accomplish individualized goals for individuals of all ages
and ability levels within a therapeutic relationship.
(2) “Practice of music therapy” includes:
(i) Accepting referrals for music therapy services from:
1. Medical, developmental, mental health, or education
professionals;
2. Family members;
3. Clients;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 31
4. Caregivers; or
5. Others involved with the provision of and authorized to
provide client services;
(ii) Collaborating with a client’s treatment team to review the
client’s diagnosis, treatment needs, and treatment plan before providing music therapy
services to a client for an identified clinical or developmental need;
(iii) Collaborating with a client’s treatment team during the
provision of music therapy services to the client, including collaborating with and
discussing the music therapy treatment plan with the audiologist or speech–language
pathologist of a client with a communication disorder so that a music therapist may work
with the client and address communication skills;
(iv) Conducting a music therapy assessment of a client to collect
systematic, comprehensive, and accurate information necessary to determine the
appropriate type of music therapy services to provide for the client;
(v) Developing an individualized music therapy treatment plan for
a client that is based on the music therapy assessment;
(vi) Implementing an individualized music therapy treatment plan
that:
1. Is consistent with any other developmental, rehabilitative,
habilitative, medical, mental health, preventive, or wellness care or educational services
being provided to a client; and
2. Does not replace the services provided by an audiologist or
a speech–language pathologist;
(vii) Evaluating a client’s response to music therapy and the
individualized music therapy treatment plan, documenting change and progress, and
suggesting modifications, as appropriate;
(viii) Developing a plan for determining when the provision of music
therapy services is no longer needed in collaboration with a client, the client’s physician or
another provider of health care or education for the client, an appropriate member of the
client’s family, and any other appropriate individual on whom the client relies for support;
(ix) Minimizing any barriers to ensure that a client receives music
therapy services in the least restrictive environment;
(x) Collaborating with and educating a client, the family or caregiver
– 3 –

Ch. 31 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
of the client, or any other appropriate individual about the needs of the client that are being
addressed in music therapy and the manner in which the music therapy addresses those
needs; and
(xi) Using appropriate knowledge and skills, including research,
reasoning, and problem–solving skills, to inform practice and determine appropriate
actions in the context of each specific clinical setting.
(3) “Practice of music therapy” does not include the screening, diagnosis,
or assessment of any physical, mental, or communication disorder.
2–4A–11.1.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL
ISSUE A LIMITED LICENSE TO PRACTICE MUSIC THERAPY TO AN APPLICANT WHO:
(1) EXCEPT FOR THE EXAMINATION, MEETS THE LICENSE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 2–4A–06 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) DEMONSTRATES TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE BOARD THAT FOR
THE TERM OF THE LIMITED LICENSE THE APPLICANT WILL PRACTICE MUSIC
THERAPY ONLY UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(3) SUBMITS AN APPLICATION TO THE BOARD ON THE FORM THAT
THE BOARD REQUIRES; AND
(4) PAYS THE BOARD THE APPLICATION FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
(B) (1) THE PURPOSE OF A LIMITED LICENSE IS TO PERMIT AN
INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE MUSIC THERAPY WHILE COMPLETING THE LICENSING
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) WHILE IT IS EFFECTIVE, A LIMITED LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE
LICENSEE TO PRACTICE MUSIC THERAPY UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF A FULLY
LICENSED MUSIC THERAPIST.
(C) A LIMITED LICENSE EXPIRES ON THE FIRST ANNIVERSARY OF ITS
EFFECTIVE DATE.
(D) THE BOARD MAY RENEW THE LIMITED LICENSE ONCE FOR AN
ADDITIONAL 1–YEAR TERM, IF THE HOLDER:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 31
(1) OTHERWISE MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION;
(2) SUBMITS A RENEWAL APPLICATION TO THE BOARD ON THE FORM
THAT THE BOARD REQUIRES; AND
(3) PAYS TO THE BOARD A LIMITED LICENSE RENEWAL FEE SET BY
THE BOARD.
(E) IF THE HOLDER OF A LIMITED LICENSE FAILS TO RECEIVE A FULL
LICENSE WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE INITIAL LIMITED LICENSE WAS ISSUED, THE
INDIVIDUAL SHALL WAIT A MINIMUM OF 1 YEAR BEFORE APPLYING FOR ANOTHER
LIMITED LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 5 –